Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 190 Motor Vehicle Sales

190.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Manufacturer” means any person, partnership, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles, or imports for distribution through distributors of new motor vehicles, or any partnership, firm, association, joint venture, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, which is controlled by the manufacturer. Additionally, the term “manufacturer” shall include the following terms:

“Distributor” which means any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new motor vehicle to new motor vehicle dealers, or who maintains factory representatives, or who controls any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new motor vehicle to new motor vehicle dealers;

“Factory branch” which means a branch office maintained by a manufacturer for the purpose of selling, or offering for sale, new motor vehicles to a distributor, wholesaler, or new motor vehicle dealer, or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, factory or distributor representatives, and shall further include any sales promotion organization, whether the same be a person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of new motor vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to new motor vehicle dealers;

“Factory representative” which means a representative employed by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of making or promoting for the sale of his, its, or their new motor vehicles, or for supervising or contracting with his, its, or their dealers, or prospective dealers;

“Distributor branch” which means a branch office similarly maintained by a distributor or wholesaler for the same purposes; and

“Distributor representative” which means a representative similarly employed by a distributor, distributor branch, or wholesaler;

“Motor vehicle dealer” means any person not excluded by subsection (3) of this section, engaged in the business of selling, offering to sell, soliciting, or advertising the same, of new or used motor vehicles, or possessing motor vehicles for the purpose of resale, either on his own account, or on behalf of another, either as his primary business or incidental thereto;

The term “motor vehicle dealer” shall not include:

Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or acting under the judgment or order of any court, and any bank, trust company, or lending institution that is subject to state or federal regulation, with regard to its disposition of repossessed motor vehicles;

Public officers while performing their official duties; or

Employees of persons enumerated in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, when engaged in the specific performance of their duties as employees;

“New motor vehicle dealer” means a vehicle dealer who holds a valid sales and service agreement, franchise, or contract, granted by the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler for the sale of the manufacturer’s new motor vehicles;

“New motor vehicle dealership facility” means an established place of business which is being used or will be used primarily for the purpose of selling, buying, displaying, repairing, and servicing motor vehicles;

“Used motor vehicle dealer” means any person engaged in the business of selling at retail, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in used motor vehicles or autocycles as defined in KRS

186.010

, but shall not mean any person engaged in the business of dismantling, salvaging, or rebuilding motor vehicles by means of using used parts, or any public officer performing his official duties;

“Motor vehicle leasing dealer” means any person engaged in the business of regularly making available, offering to make available, or arranging for another person to use a motor vehicle pursuant to a bailment, lease, or other contractual arrangement under which a charge is made for its use at a periodic rate for at least a monthly term, and title to the motor vehicle is in a person other than the user, but shall not mean a manufacturer or its affiliate leasing to its employees or to dealers;

“Restricted motor vehicle dealer” means a motor vehicle dealer who exclusively sells, offers to sell, solicits, or advertises specialized motor vehicles including, but not limited to, funeral coaches, emergency vehicles, and an automotive recycling dealer engaged in the business of dismantling, salvaging, or recycling salvage motor vehicles for the purpose of harvesting used parts, components, assemblies, and recyclable materials for resale, reuse, or reclamation;

“Motorcycle dealer” means a motor vehicle dealer who exclusively sells, offers to sell, solicits, or advertises motorcycles, including alternative-speed motorcycles as defined in KRS

186.010

and autocycles as defined in KRS

186.010

. Motorcycles shall not include mopeds as defined in this section;

“Motor vehicle salesperson” means any person who is employed as a salesperson by a motor vehicle dealer to sell motor vehicles, or who is employed as an auctioneer by a motor vehicle auction dealer to sell motor vehicles at auction;

“Motor vehicle auction dealer” means any person primarily engaged in the business of offering, negotiating, or attempting to negotiate a sale, purchase, or exchange of a motor vehicle through auction;

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways that is self-propelled including low-speed motor vehicles as defined in KRS

186.010

, but shall not include any recreational vehicle or farm tractors and other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products;

“New motor vehicle” means a vehicle that is in the possession of the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler, or has been sold to the holders of a valid sales and service agreement, franchise, or contract, granted by the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler for the sale of the make of new vehicle, which is new, and on which the original title has not been issued from the franchised dealer;

“Moped” means a motorized bicycle with pedals whose frame design may include one (1) or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank, or a motorized bicycle with pedals and with a step through type frame rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;

“Commission” means the Motor Vehicle Commission;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the department;

“Department” means the Department of Vehicle Regulation;

“Licensor” means the commission;

“Established place of business” means a permanent, enclosed commercial building located within this state, easily accessible and open to the public at all reasonable times, and at which the business of a vehicle dealer, including the display and repair of vehicles, may be lawfully carried on in accordance with the terms of all applicable building codes, zoning, and other land use regulatory ordinances;

“Person” means a person, partnership, firm, corporation, association, trust, estate, or other legal entity;

“Franchise” means the agreement or contract between any new motor vehicle manufacturer, written or otherwise, and any new motor vehicle dealer that purports to fix the legal rights and liabilities of the parties to an agreement or contract, and pursuant to which the dealer purchases and resells the franchise product;

“Good faith” means honesty in fact, and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade, as is defined and interpreted in KRS

355.2-103

(1)(b);

“Designated family member” means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of a dealer who, in the case of a deceased dealer, is entitled to inherit the dealer’s ownership interest in the dealership under the terms of the dealer’s will; or who has otherwise been designated in writing by a deceased dealer to succeed him in the motor vehicle dealership; or who, under the laws of intestate succession of this state is entitled to inherit the interest; or who, in the case of an incapacitated dealer, has been appointed by a court as the legal representative of the dealer’s property. The term includes the appointed and qualified personal representative and testamentary trustee of a deceased dealer;

“Fraud” means a misrepresentation in any manner, whether intentionally false or due to gross negligence, of a material fact; a promise or representation not made in good faith; or an intentional failure to disclose material fact;

“Sale” means the issuance, transfer, agreement for transfer, exchange, lease, pledge, hypothecation, mortgage in any form, whether by transfer in trust or otherwise, of any motor vehicle or interest in it, or of any franchise related to it, as well as any option, subscription, other contract, or solicitation looking to a sale, offer to attempt to sell in any form, whether spoken or written. A gift or delivery of any motor vehicle or franchise with respect thereto, with or as a bonus on account of the sale of anything, shall be deemed a sale of the motor vehicle or franchise;

“Automotive mobility dealer” means any motor vehicle dealer who:

Exclusively engages in the business of selling, offering to sell, or soliciting or advertising the sale of adapted vehicles;

Possesses adapted vehicles exclusively for the purpose of resale, either on his or her own account or on behalf of another, as his or her primary business or incidental thereto; or

Engages in the business of selling, installing, or servicing; offering to sell, install, or service; or soliciting or advertising the sale, installation, or servicing of equipment or modifications specifically designed to facilitate use or operation of a motor vehicle by an aging or disabled person;

“Adapted vehicle” means a new or used motor vehicle especially designed or modified for use by an aging or disabled person;

“Mobility equipment” means equipment specifically designed to facilitate the use of a motor vehicle by an aging or disabled person;

“Nonprofit motor vehicle dealer” means a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that purchases motor vehicles that it may offer for purchase to clients and other individuals who meet the definition of client as defined in this section and who are referred to the organization by public or private social service agencies;

“Client” means a person who has an open case file with a nonprofit organization or governmental agency and who meets the standards for disability or disadvantaging condition as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant to KRS 190.032(4);

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicle that:

Is primarily designed as temporary living quarters for noncommercial recreation or camping use;

Has its own motive power or is towed by another vehicle;

Is regulated by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration as a vehicle; and

Does not require a special highway use permit; and

“New recreational vehicle dealer” means a new recreational vehicle dealer as defined in KRS

190A.010

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 1; 2017 ch. 69, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

190.015.
Public policy declared.

The Legislature finds and declares that the distribution and sale of vehicles within this state vitally affects the general economy of the state and the public interest and the public welfare, and that in order to promote the public interest and public welfare, and in the exercise of its police power, it is necessary to regulate and license vehicle manufacturers, distributors or wholesalers, brokers and auctioneers, and factory or distributor representatives, and to regulate and license dealers of vehicles doing business in this state, in order to prevent frauds, impositions, and other abuses upon its citizens, and to protect and preserve the investments and properties of the citizens of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 6; 1982, ch. 373, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

190.020.
Commission to issue licenses and supervise licensees.

The commission shall, under administrative regulations promulgated by it, issue the licenses provided for by KRS

190.010

to

190.080

and shall have supervision over the licensees thereunder in respect to all the provisions of KRS

190.010

to

190.080

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 2; 1966, ch. 175, § 2; 1982, ch. 374, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

190.030.
License requirement — Application for license — Time within which license to be granted or refused — Licenses to be displayed — Administrative regulations establishing fees — Temporary sale or display — Bond — Reports by motor vehicle dealer and new recreational dealer.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer, new, used, or auction motor vehicle dealer, nonprofit motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle leasing dealer, restricted motor vehicle dealer, motorcycle dealer, broker, wholesaler, automotive recycling dealer, new recreational vehicle dealer, a salesperson of motor vehicles, or a salesperson of new recreational vehicles shall not engage in business in this state at any location without a license issued for that location as provided in KRS

190.010

to

190.080

.

An entity identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection with an established place of business may conduct sales activities via the Internet and deliver vehicles sold or leased by the licensed dealer to a customer at the customer’s residence or other suitable location, as long as the sale, lease, or delivery is requested by the customer.

If a person licensed as a motor vehicle dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer acts as a motor vehicle salesperson or a new recreational vehicle salesperson, that person shall secure a motor vehicle salesperson’s license or a new recreational vehicle salesperson’s license in addition to a license for a motor vehicle dealer or for a new recreational vehicle dealer.

A manufacturer of motor vehicles, recreational vehicles, factory branch, distributor, distributor branch, or wholesaler shall not engage in business in this state without a license as provided in KRS

190.010

to

190.080

.

A factory representative or distributor representative shall not engage in business in this state without a license as provided in KRS

190.010

to

190.080

.

Application for license shall be made to the licensor, at a time, in a form, and containing information the licensor shall require and shall be accompanied by the required fee. The licensor may require, as part of the application process, information relating to the applicant’s solvency, financial standing, or other pertinent matter commensurate with the safeguarding of the public interest in the locality in which the applicant proposes to engage in business. The information may be considered by the licensor in determining the fitness of the applicant to engage in business as set forth in this section.

All licenses shall be granted or refused within thirty (30) days after submission of a complete application and shall expire, unless revoked or suspended, on December 31 of the calendar year for which they are granted. If a complaint of unfair cancellation of dealer franchise is in the process of being heard, a replacement application for the franchise shall not be considered until a decision is rendered by the commission.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish annual license fees, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), for:

New motor vehicle dealers;

Used motor vehicle dealers;

Motor vehicle leasing dealers;

Restricted motor vehicle dealers;

Motorcycle dealers;

Motor vehicle manufacturers and factory branches;

Distributors, motor vehicle auction dealers, and wholesalers;

Factory representatives and distributor branch representatives;

Automotive mobility dealers;

Nonprofit motor vehicle dealers;

Recreational vehicle manufacturers and distributors; and

New recreational vehicle dealers.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish annual license fees, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), for motor vehicle salespersons and new recreational vehicle salespersons.

In addition to the annual license fees established under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the commission may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish licenses and appropriate fees for other licensee activities.

A license fee imposed on motor vehicle salespersons and new recreational vehicle salespersons shall be paid by the licensed dealer for every salesperson the dealer employs.

A license fee shall not be imposed on nonprofit motor vehicle dealer salespersons.

The licenses of dealers, manufacturers, factory branches, distributors, and distributor branches shall specify the location of the office or branch and shall be conspicuously displayed there. If the location is changed, the licensor shall endorse the change of location on the license. A licensee shall not be charged a fee for changing locations. A change of location shall require a new application.

A motor vehicle dealer who is not a new motor vehicle dealer may conduct a temporary sale or display in the county where the dealer is licensed to conduct business.

A new motor vehicle dealer may conduct a temporary sale or display in the dealer’s market as defined in KRS 190.047(6).

A recreational vehicle dealer may conduct a temporary sale or display in the county where the dealer is licensed to conduct business or in any other county where there is no licensed recreational vehicle dealer.

A temporary sale or display may be conducted under this subsection if the temporary sale or display is permitted under an enabling ordinance enacted by the city, county, urban-county, or consolidated local government within whose boundaries the temporary sale or display is to be conducted. A temporary sale or display shall be advertised as temporary in nature and shall consist of a representative sampling of the inventory of each participating licensee.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer.

Every salesperson, factory representative, or distributor representative shall carry his license when engaged in business, and display it upon request. The license shall name his employer; and in case of a change of employer, the salesperson shall immediately mail his license to the licensor who shall endorse the change on the license without charge.

If the licensor has reasonable cause to doubt the financial responsibility or the compliance by the applicant or licensee with the provisions of this statute, the licensor may require the applicant or licensee to furnish and maintain a bond in a form, amount and with sureties up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), conditioned upon the applicant or licensee complying with the provisions of the statutes applicable to the licensee. The bonds shall be executed in the name of the State of Kentucky for the benefit of any aggrieved parties, but the penalty of the bond shall not be invoked except after a court adjudication. The commission may promulgate administrative regulations to permit the applicant to submit evidence, in lieu of posting bond, that reliable financial arrangements, deposits, or commitments exist providing assurance, substantially equivalent to that afforded by a bond complying with this subsection, for payment on conditions and indemnity set forth in this subsection. The bonding requirements of this subsection shall not apply to manufacturers, factory branches, and their agents.

Application for dealer’s license shall be submitted to the commission and contain information the commission may require. A motor vehicle dealer, unless licensed under KRS

190.010

to

190.080

, shall not be permitted to register, receive, or use any motor vehicle registration plates.

Every motor vehicle dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer licensed in accordance with the provisions of this section shall make reports to the licensor at intervals and show information the licensor may require.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 3; 1966, ch. 175, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 313, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 373, § 3, effective July 15, 19821982, ch. 374, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 452, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 186, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 13, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 125, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 43, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 27, § 16, effective January 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 156, § 15, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 190, § 14, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 156 and 190. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 190, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The department of motor transportation (now department of vehicle regulation) can rely upon the advice given to the commissioner by the advisory committee as such advice would constitute good cause for issuing or revoking salesmen’s licenses.

OAG 64-862

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Registration of dealers and salesmen with county clerk; fees; dealer’s plates, KRS

186.070

.

190.031.
Automotive mobility dealers — License and regulation requirements.

Any person, prior to engaging or continuing in the business of an automotive mobility dealer after June 26, 2007, shall obtain an automotive mobility dealer license from the commission.

An automotive mobility dealer shall be licensed and regulated by the commission under the provisions of this chapter.

The commission shall, by administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, establish requirements for initial application for and renewal of a license to be an automotive mobility dealer. The commission’s regulations establishing requirements for automotive mobility dealers shall include provisions for automotive mobility dealers to meet reasonable and appropriate quality assurance requirements. These requirements may include:

Appropriate training by automotive mobility dealers regarding adapted vehicle usage;

Driver evaluation by automotive mobility dealers; and

A requirement that automotive mobility dealers obtain and maintain insurance in an amount to be established by the commission.

The commission shall have the power to promulgate any other regulations that are necessary to implement this section.

The commission shall immediately suspend the license of an automotive mobility dealer if it determines that the dealer has sold or modified a vehicle that does not comply with this section or any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. A dealer whose license is suspended under this paragraph shall be permitted to appeal the suspension in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

A licensed automotive mobility dealer shall have the right to display, inventory, advertise, and offer for sale any adapted vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 125, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

190.032.
Nonprofit motor vehicle dealers — License and regulation requirements.

A nonprofit organization, prior to engaging in the business of a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer, shall obtain a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer license from the commission.

A nonprofit motor vehicle dealer and persons who act as salespersons for a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer shall be licensed and regulated by the commission under the provisions of this chapter, except that a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer shall not be required to:

Comply with KRS 190.030(7); or

Comply with KRS

190.035

.

A nonprofit motor vehicle dealer may sell vehicles only to:

A person who is a client of the nonprofit organization;

A person referred by other nonprofit organizations or governmental agencies who meets the definition of client as defined in KRS

190.010

; or

A licensed motor vehicle dealer or automotive recycling dealer.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements for initial application for and renewal of a license to be a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer and standards for disability and disadvantaging condition. In addition, the commission may promulgate additional administrative regulations that are necessary to implement this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 43, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

190.033.
Insurance or bond required of licensees — Exemption.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a motor vehicle dealer’s license, new recreational vehicle dealer’s license, motor vehicle auction dealer’s license, or wholesaler’s license shall not be issued or renewed unless the applicant or holder of the license shall have on file with the commission an approved indemnifying bond or insurance policy issued by a surety company or insurance carrier authorized to transact business within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The term of the bond or policy shall be continuous and shall remain in full force until canceled under proper notice. All bonds or policies shall be issued in the name of the holder or applicant for the dealer’s license or wholesaler’s license. The bond or policy for all dealers except automotive recycling dealers shall provide public liability and property damage coverage for the operation of any vehicle owned or being offered for sale by the dealer or wholesaler when being operated by the owner or seller, his agents, servants, employees, prospective customers, or other persons. In circumstances where a customer’s or other person’s vehicle is out of use because of breakdown, repair, or servicing and a motor vehicle is loaned, with or without consideration, the coverage mandated by this section shall be in excess of, and be deemed secondary to, the collision, bodily injury, and property damage liability coverage under a customer’s or other person’s own coverage for that person’s own negligence; otherwise the coverage mandated by this section shall be primary.

The amount of insurance shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for bodily injury or death of any one (1) person; five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for bodily injury or death in any one (1) accident; and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) property damage. The bond or policy for automotive recycling dealers shall provide commercial general liability coverage in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for bodily injury or death of any one (1) person; five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for bodily injury or death in any one (1) accident; and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) property damage.

A bond or insurance policy shall not be canceled unless fifteen (15) days’ notice by the bondsman or insurance carrier has been given in writing to the commission. Upon the cancellation of any bond or insurance policy required, the right to engage in the business of a motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler shall immediately abate. If the bond or insurance policy is reinstated within thirty (30) days from the date of cancellation, the rights granted by the license shall again be in force and effect; otherwise, the license shall become void.

A dealer that has a certificate of authority from the Department of Insurance demonstrating proof of self-insurance is exempt from this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 13; 1982, ch. 373, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 452, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 111, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 83, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 27, § 17, effective January 1, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2015). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 27 and 83, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

190.035.
Established place of business and sufficient space required for licensure by commission as motor vehicle dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer — Exemption.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a license shall not be issued by the commission for the purposes described in KRS 190.030(1) and to motor vehicle dealers or new recreational vehicle dealers, either as dealer or salesman, unless the applicant for the license has an established place of business as defined in KRS

190.010

or, for recreational vehicles as defined in KRS

190A.010

, and as provided by regulation of the commission consistent with the activity of the license applied for. A licensee may conduct more than one (1) business in a building otherwise meeting the requirements of this chapter providing he has suitable space and adequate facilities therein to properly conduct the business of a motor vehicle dealer. The lot requirement of this section may be waived if the dealer has sufficient space within a building to properly show and display the motor vehicles or new recreational vehicles being sold by him. The dealer shall display a sign easily visible from the street identifying his business.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 129; 1966, ch. 175, § 4; 1982, ch. 373, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 43, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 27, § 18, effective January 1, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

There is nothing in this section which requires that the name of a motor vehicle dealer indicate the nature of his business.

OAG 78-387

.

190.037.
Temporary permits.

Where application for any license provided for herein has been made, a temporary permit may be granted to the applicant to engage in the business for which the license is sought. The temporary permit shall be valid until such time as the application is approved or denied, but in no event for a period longer than ninety (90) days. KRS 190.040(3) shall not apply to a temporary permit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 17.

190.038.
Manufacturer to provide information on service or repairs of its motor vehicles.

Any manufacturer of motor vehicles licensed in accordance with KRS

190.030

shall provide to any person upon request and at reasonable cost, any schematic, manual or any other technical documentation needed to service or repair motor vehicles manufactured by the manufacturer of a year model not to exceed ten (10) years prior to the current year model.

Failure to comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of a manufacturer’s license in accordance with KRS

190.040

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 183, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

190.040.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of license — Notice of denial of application for license — Hearings — Inspection of licensee’s records — Appeals from order of commission.

A license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Proof of financial or moral unfitness of applicant;

Material misstatement in application for license;

Filing a materially false or fraudulent tax return as certified by the Department of Revenue;

Willful failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated under this chapter;

Willfully defrauding any retail buyer to the buyer’s damage;

Willful failure to perform any written agreement with any buyer;

Failure or refusal to furnish and keep in force any bond required;

Having made a fraudulent sale, transaction, or repossession;

False or misleading advertising;

Fraudulent misrepresentation, circumvention, or concealment through subterfuge or device of any of the material particulars or the nature of them required to be stated or furnished to the retail buyer;

Employment of fraudulent devices, methods, or practices in connection with compliance with the requirements under the statutes of this state with respect to the retaking of goods under retail installment contracts and the redemption and resale of goods;

Having violated any law relating to the sale, distribution, or financing of motor vehicles or new recreational vehicles;

Being a manufacturer of motor vehicles or recreational vehicles, factory branch, distributor, field representative, officer, agent, or any representative of the motor vehicle manufacturer, recreational vehicle manufacturer, or factory branch, who has induced, coerced, or attempted to induce or coerce any automobile dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer to accept delivery of any motor vehicle, new recreational vehicle, vehicles, parts, accessories, or any other commodities that shall not have been ordered by the dealer;

Being a manufacturer of motor vehicles or recreational vehicles, factory branch, distributor, field representative, officer, agent, or any representative of a motor vehicle manufacturer or factory branch, who has attempted to induce or coerce, or has induced or coerced, any dealer to enter into any agreement with a manufacturer, factory branch, or representative, or to do any other act unfair to the dealer, by threatening to cancel any franchise existing between a manufacturer, factory branch, or representative and the dealer;

Being a manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, field representative, officer, agent, or any representative of a motor vehicle manufacturer or factory branch, who has unfairly, without due regard to the equities of the dealer and without just provocation, canceled the franchise of any motor vehicle dealer. The nonrenewal of a franchise or selling agreement without just provocation or cause shall be deemed an evasion of this section and shall constitute an unfair cancellation;

Being a manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, field representative, officer, agent, or any representative of a motor vehicle manufacturer, recreational vehicle manufacturer, or factory branch, or wholesaler who makes, attempts to make, or aids or abets the making of a sale of a motor vehicle or a new recreational vehicle to a person other than a licensed motor vehicle dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer. This section shall not prevent any manufacturer from offering discounts or rebates on any motor vehicle or new recreational vehicle to any of its employees; or

Being a dealer who advertises for sale a new motor vehicle or new recreational vehicle unless he is a dealer operating under a franchise with a licensed manufacturer, factory branch, or distributor authorizing the sale of the new motor vehicle or the new recreational vehicle being advertised.

The licensor may deny the application for a license within thirty (30) days after receipt thereof by written notice to the applicant, stating the grounds for denial. Upon request by the applicant whose license has been denied, the licensor shall set the time and place of hearing a review of denial, to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

A license shall not be suspended or revoked except after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The commission may inspect the pertinent books, letters, records, and contracts of a licensee.

If a licensee is a firm or corporation, it shall be sufficient cause for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license that any officer, director, or trustee of the firm or corporation, or any member in case of a partnership, has been guilty of any act or omission which would be cause for refusing, suspending, or revoking a license to the party as an individual. Each licensee shall be responsible for the acts of any or all of his salesmen while acting as his agent, if the licensee approved of or had knowledge of the acts and after approval or knowledge retained the benefit, proceeds, profits, or advantages accruing from the acts.

Any licensee or other person in interest who is dissatisfied with a final order of the commission may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court and to the Court of Appeals in the manner provided by KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 4; 1966, ch. 175, § 5; 1972, ch. 211, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1982, ch. 374, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 452, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 111, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 76, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 23, § 2, effective February 22, 2000; 2000, ch. 216, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 616, effective June 20, 2005; 2014, ch. 27, § 19, effective January 1, 2015.

190.041.
Law not applicable to manufacturers or distributors — Exception. [Repealed.]

190.042.
Succession to ownership of a new motor vehicle dealership of a deceased or incapacitated owner.

Any owner of a new motor vehicle dealership may appoint by will, or any other written instrument, a designated family member to succeed in the ownership interest of the said owner in the new motor vehicle dealership.

Unless there exists good cause for refusal to honor succession on the part of the manufacturer or distributor, any designated family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealership may succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealership under the existing franchise provided that:

The designated family member gives the manufacturer or distributor written notice of his or her intention to succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealership within ninety (90) days of the owner’s death or incapacity; and

The designated family member agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the franchise.

The manufacturer or distributor may request, and the designated family member shall provide, promptly upon said request, personal and financial data that is reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 373, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.